District of Columbia statutes.
16-575

Judgment against employer-garnishee for failure to pay percentages.

If the employer-garnishee fails to pay to the judgment creditor the percentages prescribed in this subchapter of the wages which become payable to the judgment debtor for any pay period, judgment shall be entered against him for an amount equal to the percentages with respect to which the failure occurs.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 556, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 16-575.
1973 Ed., § 16-575.

Prior Codifications